Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.260

Inventory of economic development grant opportunities—Joint efforts for grant seeking and attracting major events.

(1) The department shall make available, within existing resources, an inventory of grant opportunities for state agencies, local governments, and other community organizations engaged in economic development activities.

(2) In developing the inventory of economic development grant opportunities, the department may:

(a) Regularly review the federal register for opportunities to apply for grants, research projects, and demonstration projects;

(b) Maintain an inventory of grant opportunities with private foundations and businesses;

(c) Provide a resource guide for applicants for federal grants, including links to federal applications and relevant resources, and contact information for department assistance; and

(d) Consult with federal officials, including but not limited to those in the small business administration, the department of labor, the department of commerce, the department of agriculture, the department of ecology, as well as private foundations and businesses, on the prospects for obtaining federal and private funds for economic development purposes in Washington state.

(3) The department may also facilitate joint efforts between agencies and between local organizations and state agencies that will increase the likelihood of success in grant seeking and the attraction of major events.

[ 2024 c 223 s 4; 2006 c 314 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2024 c 223: See note following RCW 43.330.070.

Finding—2006 c 314: "The legislature declares that it is the state's policy to encourage the use of federal and private funds for economic development purposes and to use state resources to leverage federal and private dollars to supplement state economic development efforts." [ 2006 c 314 s 1.]